nama.twol
# Зададим алфавит
Alphabet
  b d g p t k ts kh f s x h w l j m n r 
  ǀ ǃ ǂ ǁ 
  ǀg ǃg ǂg ǁg 
  ǀh ǃh ǂh ǁh
  ǀkh ǃkh ǂkh ǁkh
  ǀn ǃn ǂn ǁn
  a e i o u
  ̂ ͡
  ̏ ̀  ́ 	̋
  ̄
  %>:0
  %{N%}:n %{N%}:m
  %{I%}:0 %{I%}:i
  %{B%}:0 %{B%}:b
  %{PGN3SGm%}:b %{PGN3SGm%}:i
  %{Space%}:% 
;

Sets
Consonant = b d g p t k ts kh f s x h w j;
Sonorant = l m n r;
Clicks = ǀ ǃ ǂ ǁ ǀg ǃg ǂg ǁg ǀh ǃh ǂh ǁh ǀkh ǃkh ǂkh ǁkh ǀn ǃn ǂn ǁn;
Vowels = a e i o u;
Nasalisation = ̂ ͡;
Tones = ̏ ̀  ́  ̋;
Long = ̄;

# Установим морфологические правила и правила замены
Rules
"Space"
%{Space%}:%  <=> _ ;
"PGN 3sgm n"
%{N%}:n <=> n _ ;
"PGN 3sgm m"
%{N%}:m <=> m _ ;
"PGN 3sgm i"
%{PGN3SGm%}:i <=> Sonorant _ ;
"PGN 3plc in"
%{I%}:i <=> Sonorant _ ;
"PGN 3sgmobl a"
%{B%}:0 <=> Sonorant _ ;
"intervocalic p to w"
p:w <=> Vowel _ Vowel ;
